Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.059

Credit for service in Seattle's police relief and pension fund system.

Any active member of this retirement system who has previously established ten or more years' service credit in the city of Seattle's police relief and pension fund system, who withdrew his or her contributions from Seattle's police relief and pension fund system prior to July 1, 1961, and who has never been a member of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' pension system created in chapter 41.26 RCW, may receive credit in this retirement system for such service, subject to the terms and conditions specified in RCW 41.40.061.

[ 1992 c 157 s 3.]